Arkansas, session 2025, HB1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-23-202, concerning the duties of the
Arkansas Waterways Commission, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(c) The Arkansas Waterways Commission may:
(1) Protect and police the property of the commission, in
cooperation with the law enforcement agencies and officers having
jurisdiction in the area where the property of the commission is located; and
(2) Appoint one (1) or more persons to be designated by the
commission as an Arkansas Waterways Commission law enforcement officer to aid
and supplement the law enforcement agencies of this state in the protection
of the persons and property of the commission subject to § 15-23-201 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 23, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-23-206. Jurisdiction and powers.
*ZRC032*
01/28/2025 2:45:43 PM ZRC032

HB1289
(a) An Arkansas Waterways Commission law enforcement officer may:
(1) Arrest a person, whether on or off the Arkansas Waterways
Commission's property, for the violation of a law on the commission's
property, under § 16-81-106(b) and (c); and
(2) Carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of carrying out
the duties of a law enforcement officer of the commission.
(b) A law enforcement officer of the commission shall be a certified
law enforcement officer under § 12-9-101 et seq.




























01/28/2025 2:45:43 PM ZRC032